Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2583.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. NEW SECTION . 478.34 Electric transmission emergency planning and coordination. 1. For purposes of this section: a. âElectric transmission lineâ means a high-voltage electric transmission line with a capacity of two hundred kilovolts or more that has been approved for construction on or after July 1, 2022, for construction in a federally registered House File 2583, p. 2 planning authority transmission plan with costs allocated regionally. b. âElectric transmission line ownerâ means an individual or entity that owns and maintains an electric transmission line. c. âProclaimed disaster emergencyâ means a state of disaster emergency proclaimed by the governor pursuant to section 29C.6. 2. a. An electric transmission line owner shall independently develop an emergency response plan and submit the plan to the commission. The plan shall contain at least all of the following information: (1) The name, title, and twenty-four-hour contact information of at least two designated individuals with the authority to coordinate and direct the electric transmission line ownerâs emergency response and restoration efforts. Each electric transmission line owner shall notify the commission of any change to this contact information within twenty-four hours of the change occurring. (2) Procedures for notifying state and local emergency management agencies and neighboring utilities during a service interruption. (3) Strategies for the staging and mobilization of personnel, equipment, and materials for expeditious restoration. (4) A summary of mutual aid arrangements with other entities for supplemental repair crews and equipment. (5) A methodology for prioritizing the restoration of service to essential facilities, including hospitals, water treatment plants, and public safety communications. b. An electric transmission line owner currently constructing, operating, or maintaining an electric transmission line or who has been issued a franchise under section 478.4 shall submit an initial emergency response plan to the commission by December 31, 2026. Updated plans shall be submitted annually thereafter, or within thirty days of a material change, in the form and manner prescribed by the commission. An electric transmission line owner who seeks to construct an electric transmission line, and who has not previously filed an emergency response plan with the commission, shall file an initial emergency response plan House File 2583, p. 3 with the commission within ninety days after the filing of a petition under section 478.2. c. An emergency response plan or information submitted pursuant to this section shall be considered a confidential record and shall be kept confidential, as provided in section 22.7, subsection 50. The records shall not be subject to disclosure, except as necessary for the coordination of emergency response and restoration efforts between authorized state and utility personnel. 3. a. An electric transmission line owner shall notify the commission in the form and manner prescribed by the commission when it is projected, after an initial assessment of the nature and scope of the damage to the transmission line and initial information from any impacted utility providing electricity to end user customers, that an outage may result in a loss of service to end user customers for more than six hours, provided the outage meets the criteria for a significant interruption, as defined by commission rule. Notification shall be made at the earliest possible time after the determination and shall include all of the following: (1) The general nature and cause of the interruption. (2) The geographic area of the affected end user customers and the impacted franchise. (3) A preliminary assessment of the extent of damage. (4) The estimated time for restoration. b. The notice required under paragraph âaâ shall be supplemented as more complete or accurate information becomes available, including updates to the estimated restoration time. 4. In the event of an actual or imminent proclaimed disaster emergency, the electric transmission line owners shall coordinate operational responses with each other, as necessary, for repair and restoration to occur in an expeditious and orderly manner, and shall provide the commission and the department of homeland security and emergency management with information as requested to facilitate state-level emergency response decision making and assistance. 5. An electric transmission line owner that violates any provision of this section or any rule adopted pursuant to this section is subject to a civil penalty, which may be levied House File 2583, p. 4 by the commission, of not more than one thousand dollars per violation or ten thousand dollars per day of a continuing violation, whichever is greater. ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate I hereby certify that this bill originated in the House and is known as House File 2583, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ MEGHAN NELSON Chief Clerk of the House Approved _______________, 2026 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor